Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 22 Vinegar

21-22-1.
False representation as cider vinegar.

No person shall by himself or herself, his or her servant or agent, or as the servant or agent of any other person, sell, exchange, or have in his or her custody or possession, with intent to sell or exchange, or expose or offer for sale or exchange, any adulterated vinegar, or label, brand, or sell as cider vinegar any vinegar not made exclusively from apple cider.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1903, ch. 1107, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 174, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 205, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 270, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-22-1

.

21-22-2.
Artificial coloring prohibited — Acetic acid and vinegar solid requirements.

All vinegars shall be without artificial coloring matter, and shall contain not less than four grams (4 gs.) of acetic acid in one hundred grams (100 gs.) of the vinegar. Cider vinegar shall contain in addition to four grams (4 gs.) of acetic acid not less than one and six-tenths grams (1.6 gs.) of cider vinegar solids in one hundred grams (100 gs.) of the vinegar. If any vinegar contains any artificial coloring matter, or less than the amount of acidity required by this section, or, in the case of a cider vinegar, if it contains less than the amount of acidity or cider vinegar solids required by this section, it shall be deemed to be an adulteration within the meaning of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 148, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 1917, ch. 1468, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 205, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 270, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-22-2

.

21-22-3.
Metallic salts — Mineral acids.

All vinegars shall be without any metallic salts of arsenic, lead, copper, tin, or zinc, or any sulphuric, hydrochloric, nitric, or other mineral acid injurious to health; and if any vinegar contains any metallic salts of arsenic, lead, copper, tin, or zinc, or any sulphuric, hydrochloric, nitric, or other mineral acid injurious to health, it shall be deemed to be adulterated within the meaning of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 148, § 6; P.L. 1903, ch. 1107, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 174, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 205, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 270, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-22-3

.

21-22-4.
Complaints for violations.

It shall be the duty of the director of health to make complaint for all violations of this chapter, and the director shall not be required to give surety for costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1597, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 174, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 205, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 270, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-22-4

.

21-22-5.
Access to premises — Taking and analysis of specimens.

Every duly authorized agent of the department of health may enter any place where vinegar is stored or kept for sale, and examine all carriages used in the conveyance of vinegar; and whenever the agent has reason to believe any vinegar found by him or her is adulterated, the agent shall take specimens of it and cause the vinegar to be analyzed or satisfactorily tested, the result of which the agent shall record and preserve as evidence, and a certificate of the result, sworn to by the analyzer, shall be admissible in evidence in all prosecutions under this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 148, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 174, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 205, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 270, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 180; G.L. 1956, §

21-22-5

.

21-22-6.
Penalties for violations.

Any person violating the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in chapters 1, 17, 23, and 30 of this title for like offenses.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 148, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 174, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 205, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 270, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

21-22-6

.